Utah statutes.
77-15a-105.   Defendant's wilful failure to cooperate -- Expert testimony
regarding retardation is barred.
(1)  If the defendant files notice, raises the issue, or intends to present
evidence or make an argument that the defendant is exempt from the death
penalty under this chapter, the defendant shall make himself available and
fully cooperate in any examination by mental health experts appointed by the
Department of Human Services and any other independent examiners for the
defense or the prosecution.
(2)  If the defendant wilfully fails to make himself available and fully
cooperate in the examination, and that failure is established to the
satisfaction of the court, the defendant is barred from presenting expert
testimony relating to any exemption from the death penalty under this chapter.
